en: Badminton Racquets & Sets
xx: Badminton Racquets & Sets
cs: Badmintonové rakety
da: Badmintonketsjere
de: Badmintonschläger & -sets
es: Raquetas y kits de bádminton
fr: Raquettes et ensembles de badminton
it: Set e racchette da badminton
ja: バドミントンラケット
nl: Badmintonrackets
no: Badmintonracketer og -sett
pl: Rakiety do badmintona
pt: Raquetes para badminton
ru: Ракетки и наборы для бадминтона
sv: Badmintonracketar
tr: Badminton Raketleri ve Setleri

en: Shuttlecocks
xx: Shuttlecocks
cs: Badmintonové míčky
da: Fjerbolde
de: Federball
es: Plumas
fr: Volants de Badminton
it: Volani
ja: バドミントンシャトル
nl: Badmintonshuttles
no: Fjærballer
pl: Lotki
pt: Petecas
ru: Воланы
sv: Badmintonbollar
tr: Badminton Topları

en: Deck Shuffleboard
xx: Deck Shuffleboard
cs: Pozemní shuffleboard
da: Shuffleboard på dæk
de: Shuffleboard
es: Juegos de tejos
fr: Shuffeboard d'extérieur
it: Shuffleboard da ponte
ja: デッキシャッフルボード
nl: Deckshuffleboard
no: Utendørs shuffleboard
pl: Shuffleboard
pt: Shuffleboard de navio
ru: Шаффлборд
sv: Shuffleboard
tr: Deck Shuffleboard

en: Deck Shuffleboard Cues
xx: Deck Shuffleboard Cues
cs: Tága k pozemnímu shuffleboardu
da: Køller til shuffleboard
de: Shuffleboard-Cues
es: Tacos para juegos de tejos
fr: Palettes pour shuffleboard d'extérieur
it: Aste shuffleboard da ponte
ja: デッキシャッフルボード用キュー
nl: Cues voor deckshuffleboard
no: Køer til utendørs shuffleboard
pl: Kije do gry w shuffleboard
pt: Tacos para shuffleboard de navio
ru: Кии для шаффлборда
sv: Shuffleboardköer
tr: Deck Shuffleboard Sopaları

en: Deck Shuffleboard Pucks
xx: Deck Shuffleboard Pucks
cs: Puky k pozemnímu shuffleboardu
da: Pucker til shuffleboard
de: Shuffleboard-Disks
es: Discos para juegos de tejos
fr: Palets pour shuffleboard d'extérieur
it: Dischi shuffleboard da ponte
ja: デッキシャッフルボード用ディスク
nl: Pucks voor deckshuffleboard
no: Pucker til utendørs shuffleboard
pl: Krążki do gry w shuffleboard
pt: Discos para shuffleboard de navio
ru: Шайбы для шаффлборда
sv: Shuffleboardpuckar
tr: Deck Shuffleboard Topları

en: Disc Golf
xx: Disc Golf
cs: Discgolf
da: Discgolf
de: Discgolf
es: Golf con disco
fr: Disque golf
it: Disc golf
ja: ディスクゴルフ
nl: Frisbeegolf
no: Frisbeegolf
pl: Dysk golf
pt: Golfe de discos
ru: Диск-гольф
sv: Frisbeegolf
tr: Disc Golf

en: Disc Golf Bags
xx: Disc Golf Bags
cs: Tašky na discgolf
da: Discgolftasker
de: Discgolf-Taschen
es: Bolsas de golf con disco
fr: Sacs de disque golf
it: Borse per disc golf
ja: ディスクゴルフバック
nl: Tassen voor frisbeegolf
no: Frisbeegolfvesker
pl: Torby do dysk golfa
pt: Sacos para discos de golfe
ru: Сумки для диск-гольфа
sv: Frisbeegolfpåsar
tr: Disc Golf Çantaları

en: Disc Golf Baskets
xx: Disc Golf Baskets
cs: Košíky na discgolf
da: Discgolfkurve
de: Discgolf-Fangkörbe
es: Cestas de golf con disco
fr: Paniers de disque golf
it: Cestelli per disc golf
ja: ディスクゴルフ用バスケット
nl: Manden voor frisbeegolf
no: Frisbeegolfkurver
pl: Kosze do dysk golfa
pt: Cestas para discos de golfe
ru: Корзины для диск-гольфа
sv: Frisbeegolfkorgar
tr: Disc Golf Potaları

en: Lawn Games
xx: Lawn Games
cs: Hry na trávník
da: Havespil
de: Rasenspiele
es: Juegos sobre hierba
fr: Jeux sur gazon
it: Giochi da prato
ja: バックヤードゲーム
nl: Lawn games
no: Hagespill
pl: Gry na trawie
pt: Jogos de gramado
ru: Газонные игры
sv: Utomhusspel
tr: Çim Oyunları

en: Molkky Sets
xx: Molkky Sets
fr: Jeux de Molkky, Molkky

en: Paddle Ball Sets
xx: Paddle Ball Sets
cs: Sady na paddleball
da: Strandtennissæt
de: Bälle für Paddle-Tennis
es: Juegos de pelotas de pádel
fr: Jeux de bolo
it: Set paddleball
ja: パドルボールセット
nl: Peddelbalsets
no: Strandtennissett
pl: Zestawy do gier z rakietkami
pt: Conjuntos de raquete com bola presa
ru: Наборы для пэдлбола
sv: Paddelbollset
tr: Paddle Ball Setleri

en: Pickleball
xx: Pickleball
cs: Pickleball
da: Pickleball
de: Pickleball
es: Pickleball
fr: Pickleball
it: Pickleball
ja: ピックルボール用品
nl: Pickleball
no: Pickleball
pl: Pickleball
pt: Pickleball
ru: Товары для пиклбола
sv: Pickleball
tr: Pickleball

en: Pickleball Paddles
xx: Pickleball Paddles
cs: Pálky na pickleball
da: Bat til pickleball
de: Pickleball-Schläger
es: Palas de pickleball
fr: Palettes de pickleball
it: Racchette da pickleball
ja: ピックルボールラケット
nl: Pickleball-paddles
no: Pickleball-racketer
pl: Rakietki do pickleballa
pt: Raquetes de pickleball
ru: Ракетки для пиклболла
sv: Pickleball-racketar
tr: Pickleball Raketleri

en: Pickleballs
xx: Pickleballs
cs: Míčky na pickleball
da: Bolde til pickleball
de: Pickleball-Bälle
es: Pelotas para pickleball
fr: Balles de pickleball
it: Palline da pickleball
ja: ピックルボール
nl: Pickleballen
no: Baller til pickleball
pl: Piłki do gry w pickleball
pt: Bolas de pickleball
ru: Мячи для пиклболла
sv: Bollar för pickleball
tr: Pickleball Topları

en: Platform & Paddle Tennis
xx: Platform & Paddle Tennis
cs: Pálkový tenis
da: Platformtennis og paddletennis
de: Paddletennis
es: Pádel
fr: Paddle-tennis
it: Platform tennis e paddle tennis
ja: プラットホームテニス・パドルテニス
nl: Platform- en paddletennis
no: Plattform- og paddletennis
pl: Tenis łopatkowy i platformowy
pt: Tênis de plataforma e padel
ru: Товары для тенниса на платформе и падл-тенниса
sv: Platform tennis och paddle tennis
tr: Platform ve Paddle Tenis

en: Platform & Paddle Tennis Paddles
xx: Platform & Paddle Tennis Paddles
cs: Pálky na pálkový tenis
da: Bat til platformtennis og paddletennis
de: Paddletennis-Schläger
es: Palas de pádel
fr: Raquettes de paddle-tennis
it: Racchette per platform tennis e paddle tennis
ja: プラットホームテニス・パドルテニス用ラケット
nl: Paddles voor platform- en paddletennis
no: Racketer for plattform- og paddletennis
pl: Rakiety do tenisa łopatkowego i platformowego
pt: Raquetes de tênis de plataforma e padel
ru: Ракетки для тенниса на платформе и падл-тенниса
sv: Racketar för platform tennis och paddle tennis
tr: Platform ve Paddle Tenis Raketleri

en: Platform Tennis Balls
xx: Platform Tennis Balls
cs: Míčky na pálkový tenis
da: Platformtennisbolde
de: Paddletennis-Bälle
es: Pelotas de pádel
fr: Balles de paddle-tennis
it: Palline da platform tennis
ja: プラットホームテニス用ボール
nl: Ballen voor platformtennis
no: Baller til plattformtennis
pl: Piłki do tenisa platformowego
pt: Bolas de tênis de plataforma
ru: Мячи для тенниса на платформе
sv: Bollar för platform tennis
tr: Platform Tenis Topları

en: Tetherball
xx: Tetherball
cs: Tetherball
da: Stangtennis
de: Tetherball
es: Tetherball
fr: Spirobole
it: Tetherball
ja: テザーボール用品
nl: Tetherball
no: Tetherball
pl: Piłka na uwięzi
pt: Espirobol
ru: Тетербол
sv: Smashboll
tr: Tetherball

en: Tetherball Poles
xx: Tetherball Poles
cs: Stožáry na tetherball
da: Stangtennispæle
de: Tetherball-Stangen
es: Postes para espirobol
fr: Poteaux de spiroballe
it: Pali da tetherball
ja: テザーボール用ポール
nl: Palen voor tetherball
no: Påler til stangtennis
pl: Słupki do gry w piłkę na uwięzi
pt: Mastros de espirobol
ru: Стойки для тетербола
sv: Tetherball-stativ
tr: Teterbol Direkleri

en: Tetherball Sets
xx: Tetherball Sets
cs: Sady na tetherball
da: Stangtennissæt
de: Tetherball-Sets
es: Conjuntos para espirobol
fr: Jeux de spiroballe
it: Set da tetherball
ja: テザーボールセット
nl: Tetherball-sets
no: Stangtennissett
pl: Zestawy do gry w piłkę na uwięzi
pt: Conjuntos de espirobol
ru: Комплекты для тетербола
sv: Tetherball-paket
tr: Teterbol Setleri